District of Columbia statutes.
29-705.04

Interim distributions.

A partner shall not have a right to any distribution before the dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership unless the limited partnership decides to make an interim distribution.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 504 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).